Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.170

Objections to leasing.

Any person may appear at the meeting of the county commissioners or any adjourned meeting thereof, and make objection to the leasing of the property, which objection shall be stated in writing. In passing upon objections the board of county commissioners shall, in writing, briefly give its reasons for accepting or rejecting the same, and such objections, and the reasons for accepting or refusing the application, shall be published by the board in the next subsequent weekly issue of the newspaper in which the notice of hearing was published.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.170. Prior: 1901 c 87 s 5; RRS s 4023.]